src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/V-aleta_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Verb - aleta: # Verb 'to go down, to get lower / aleta' - full paradigm
     aleta+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg1: alenen
     aleta+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg2: alenet
     aleta+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg3: alenou
     aleta+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl1: alenemmo
     aleta+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl2: alenetto
     aleta+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl3: aletah
     aleta+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: alene

     aleta+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg1: alenin
     aleta+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg2: alenit
     aleta+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg3: aleni
     aleta+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl1: alenimmo
     aleta+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl2: alenitto
     aleta+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl3: alettih
     aleta+V+Act+Ind+Prt+ConNeg: alennuh
     aleta+V+Act+Ind+Prt+ConNeg+Pl3: alettu
